apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="дев'ят/сот__num_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>исот</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>истам</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сот</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>истах</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьмастами</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="check">
        <p>
          <l>ьомастами</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сот</l>
          <r>сот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="с/імсот__num_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>емисот</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>емистам</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>емисот</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>емистах</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>емистами</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>імомастами</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>імсот</l>
          <r>імсот<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="дв/а__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="ani"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ома</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="ani"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ома</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ani"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ох</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ома</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ш/ість__num_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ести</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>істьох</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ести</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>істьом</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ість</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>істьох</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ести</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>істьох</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>істма</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>істьома</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ість</l>
          <r>ість<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="в/ісім__num_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>осьми</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісьмох</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>осьи</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісьмох</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісім</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісьмох</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>осьми</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісьмох</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісьма</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісьмома</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ісім</l>
          <r>ісім<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="дев'ятсот"><i>дев'ят</i><par n="дев'ят/сот__num_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="п'ятсот"><i>п'ят</i><par n="дев'ят/сот__num_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="сімсот"><i>с</i><par n="с/імсот__num_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="два"><i>дв</i><par n="дв/а__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шість"><i>ш</i><par n="ш/ість__num_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="вісім"><i>в</i><par n="в/ісім__num_mf"/></e>
